Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9B-110] Penalties and liabilities. (a)
After a hearing conducted in accordance with section 431:2-308, a reinsurance
intermediary, insurer, or reinsurer found by the commissioner to be in
violation of any provisions of this article shall:

(1) For each separate violation, pay a penalty in an
amount not exceeding $5,000;

(2) Be subject to revocation or suspension of its
license; and

(3) If a violation was committed by a reinsurance
intermediary, the reinsurance intermediary shall make restitution to the
insurer, reinsurer, rehabilitator, or liquidator of the insurer or reinsurer
for the net losses incurred by the insurer or reinsurer attributable to the
violation.

(b) The decision, determination, or order of
the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to judicial
review pursuant to chapter 91 and section 431:2-308.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall
affect the right of the commissioner to impose any other penalties provided in
the insurance law.

(d) Nothing contained in this article is
intended to or shall in any manner limit or restrict the rights of
policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other third parties or confer any
rights on those persons. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next